en: chicken meat including natural chicken juices, chicken meat and natural chicken juices, chicken meat with natural juices
de: Hühnerfleisch einschließlich natürlicher Hühnersäfte, Hühnerfleisch und natürlicher Hühnersäfte, Hühnerfleisch mit natürlichen Säften
it: carne di pollo compresi i succhi naturali di pollo

en: cooked chicken with natural juices
it: pollo cotto con succhi naturali

en: chicken fillet
bg: пилешко филе
da: kyllingefilet
de: Hühnerfilet
es: Filete de pechuga de pollo
fi: kanafilee
fr: filet de poulet, fillets de poulet, viande de filet de poulet, filets de poulet
hr: pileći file
it: Filetto di pollo
nl: kipfilet
pl: filet z kurczaka, filety z kurczaka, filet z kurcząt, mięso z fileta kurczaka, mięso z fileta z kurczaka
ru: Куриное филе
sv: kycklingfilé, kycklinginnerfilé, kycklinglårfilé, filé av kyckling

en: chicken fillet with skin
de: Hühnerfilet mit Haut
fr: filet de poulet avec peau, filets de poulet avec peau
hr: pileći file s kožom
it: filetto di pollo con pelle

de: hähnchenfilet
fi: broilerinfilee, broilerin filee, broilerin sisäfilee

en: superior chicken fillet
de: Premium Hähnchenbrustfilet
fr: filet de poulet de qualité supérieure, filets de poulet de qualité supérieure
hr: vrhunski pileći file
it: filetto di pollo pregiato

en: halal chicken filet
de: Halal-Hähnchenfleisch
fi: halal kanafilee
fr: filet de poulet halal
hr: halal pileći file
it: filetto di pollo halal
nl: halal kipfilet

fr: filet de poulet traité en salaison cuit
nl: verhitte gepekelde kipfilet

en: chicken thigh fillet
hr: file pilećeg zabatka
it: filetto di coscia di pollo

en: chicken breast, chicken breast meat
bg: пилешки гърди
ca: pit de pollastre
de: Hähnchenbrust, Hähnchenbrustfleisch
es: pechuga de pollo, carne de pechuga de pollo
fr: blanc de poulet, blancs de poulet, poitrine de poulet
hr: meso pilećih prsa, pileće meso grudi
it: Petto di pollo
lt: Vištos krūtinėlė
nl: kippenborst
pl: pierś z kurczaka, pierś kurczaka, piersi z kurczaka, piersi kurczaka, mięso z piersi kurczaka, mięso z piersi kurcząt
pt: peito de frango
ro: piept de pui
sv: kycklingbröst
tr: tavuk göğsü

en: british chicken breast
de: Putenbrust
it: petto di pollo britannico

en: chicken breast fillet
da: kyllingebrystfilet
de: hähnchenbrustfilet
fi: broilerin rintafilee, broilerin rintafileetä
fr: filet de poitrine de poulet
hr: file pilećih prsa
it: filetto di petto di pollo
nl: kippenborstfilet
pl: filet z piersi kurczaka, filet z piersi z kurczaka, filety z piersi kurczaka, filety z piersi z kurczaka, filet z piersi kurcząt, mięso z fileta piersi kurczaka
sv: kycklingbröstfilé

en: chicken thigh, chicken drumstick
bg: пилешко бутче
de: Hähnchenschenkel, Hähnchenkeule, Hähnchenschlegel
es: muslo de pollo
fi: kanankoipi
fr: cuisse de poulet, cuisses de poulet
hr: pileći batak
nb: kyllinglår
pl: udko z kurczaka, udko kurczaka, udka z kurczaka, mięso z uda kurczaka
sv: kyckling lårkött

en: chicken cutlet
de: Hühnerschnitzel
fi: kanaleike
fr: Escalopes de poulet
hr: pileći rasjek
it: cotoletta di pollo

en: chicken protein
es: proteina de pollo
hr: pileći protein
it: proteine di pollo
lt: vištienos baltymai
pl: białko z kurczaka

en: chicken wing
bg: пилешко крилце
ca: ala de pollastre, ales de pollastre
de: Hähnchenflügel
es: ala de pollo, alas de pollo
fr: aile de poulet
hr: pileće krilo
it: ala di pollo
pl: skrzydełko z kurczaka, skrzydełko kurczaka, skrzydełka z kurczaka, skrzydełka kurczaka

en: Chicken wing meat and skin
fr: aile de poulet et sa peau
it: carne e pelle di ala di pollo

en: chick egg white or protein
de: Hühnereiweiß, Hühnereieiweiß, Hühnereiklar, Hühnerei-Eiweiß
hr: bjelanjak kokošjeg jajeta ili protein
it: albume d'uovo di gallina o proteine
pl: białko jaja kurzego

en: duck
bg: патица
ca: ànec
da: And
de: Ente
es: Pato
fi: ankka
fr: canard
hr: patka
hu: kacsa
it: Anatra
nl: eend
pl: Kaczka
pt: Pato
sv: Anka
tr: ördek
zh: 鸭

en: duck meat
bg: патешко месо
ca: carn d'ànec
de: Entenfleisch
es: Carne de pato
fi: ankanliha
fr: viande de canard
hr: pačje meso
it: Carne d'anatra
nl: Eendenvlees
pl: mięso z kaczki, mięso kacze, kacze mięso